Hawaii statutes.
[§103D-1008] Taxpayer preference. For
evaluation purposes, the bidder's tax-exempt price shall be increased by the
applicable retail rate of general excise tax and the applicable use tax. For
competitive sealed bids, the lowest responsive, responsible bidder, taking into
consideration the above increase, shall be awarded the contract, but the
contract amount of any contract awarded shall be the amount of the price
offered and shall not include the amount of the increase. [L 1999, c 149, pt of
§3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next